Arkansas, session 2025, SB45.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-24-204(a), concerning special license
plates or license plates with permanent decals for members and veterans of
the United States Armed Forces, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The following special license plates or license plates with
permanent decals for members and veterans of the United States Armed Forces
and similar entities that were in existence or authorized by enactment on or
before April 13, 2005, shall continue to be issued by the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration to an eligible applicant:
(1) Disabled Veteran;
(2) Disabled Veteran — World War I;
(3) Disabled Veteran — Nonservice injury;
(4) Medal of Honor Recipient;
(5) Ex-Prisoner of War;
(6) Military Reserve;
*ZRC028*
02-05-2025 13:49:52 ZRC028

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 SB45
(7) Pearl Harbor Survivor;
(8) Merchant Marine;
(9)(8) World War II Veteran;
(10)(9) Korean War Veteran;
(11)(10) Vietnam Veteran;
(12)(11) Persian Gulf Veteran;
(13)(12) Armed Forces Veteran;
(14)(13) Distinguished Flying Cross;
(15)(14) Operation Iraqi Freedom Veteran; and
(16)(15) Operation Enduring Freedom Veteran.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-24-206(c), concerning whether an
eligible applicant may receive additional copies of special license plates,
is amended to read as follows:
(c) An eligible applicant for the issuance or renewal of any of
the following special license plates may obtain one (1) additional special
license plate upon payment of a fee not to exceed one dollar ($1.00) and up
to two (2) more additional special license plates under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section:
(1) Pearl Harbor Survivor;
(2) Medal of Honor Recipient;
(3)(2) Disabled Veteran;
(4)(3) Disabled Veteran — World War I;
(5)(4) Purple Heart Recipient; or
(6)(5) A retired member of the United States Armed Forces under
§ 27-24-210.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 24, Subchapter 2, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
27-24-216. Women Veterans.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall create and issue a Women Veterans special license plate in the manner
and subject to the conditions provided under this subchapter.
(b) The Women Veterans special license plate shall be:
(1) Designed by the Department of Finance and Administration in
consultation with the Department of Veterans Affairs Women Veterans Program;
02-05-2025 13:49:52 ZRC028

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 SB45
and
(2) Numbered consecutively.
(c) The procedures concerning costs for issuance under § 27-24-206 and
§ 27-24-209 apply.
(d) The Department of Finance and Administration shall issue a special
license plate under this section to an applicant upon payment of:
(1) The fee required by law for registration or renewal of the
motor vehicle;
(2)(A) Fifteen dollars ($15.00) to cover the design-use
contribution.
(B) The design-use contribution shall be remitted monthly
to the Department of Veterans Affairs to be used as follows:
(i) Until the Department of Veterans Affairs
recovers the expenses incurred in the creation of the Women Veterans special
license plate:
(a) Ten dollars ($10.00) shall be used by the
Department of Veterans Affairs as repayment of the expenses the Department of
Veterans Affairs incurred in the creation of the Women Veterans special
license plate; and
(b) Five Dollars ($5.00) shall be used by the
Department of Veterans Affairs to fund and support educational programs and
conferences of the Department of Veterans Affairs Women Veterans Program; and
(ii) When the Department of Veterans Affairs has
fully recovered the expenses incurred in the creation of the Women Veterans
special license plate, the entire amount of the design-use contribution shall
be used by the Department of Veterans Affairs to fund and support educational
programs and conferences of the Department of Veterans Affairs Women Veterans
Program; and
(3) The fees as specified under § 27-24-206.
(e)(1) A woman veteran of the United States Armed Forces may apply for
and annually renew a special license plate issued under this section as
provided under § 27-24-206(a) and (b).
(2) As used in this section, "United States Armed Forces" means
the:
(1) United States Army;
(2) United States Navy;
02-05-2025 13:49:52 ZRC028

As Engrossed: H2/5/25 SB45
(3) United States Air Force;
(4) United States Marine Corps;
(5) United States Space Force; and
(6) United States Coast Guard.
(f)(1) Upon the initial application for a special license plate issued
under this section, a woman veteran of the United States Armed Forces shall
provide adequate proof to the Department of Finance and Administration that
she meets the requirements of this section.
(2) The proof required under subdivision (f)(1) of this section
may include without limitation:
(A) The applicant's Arkansas driver's license or
identification card; and
(B) The applicant's DD form 214.
(g) The registration of a special license plate under this section may
continue from year to year as long as it is renewed each year within the time
and in the manner required by law.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. EFFECTIVE DATE.
This act is effective on and after October 1, 2025.

/s/D. Wallace















02-05-2025 13:49:52 ZRC028